test/src/morphology/V-wriiksw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - õrīkšõ: # Verb 55 'eng /est kadestada/fin' - full paradigm
     õrīkšõ+V+Inf: õrīkšõ
     õrīkšõ+V+Ger: õrīkšõs
     õrīkšõ+V+Sup: õrīkšõm
     õrīkšõ+V+Sup+Ine: õrīkšõmõs
     õrīkšõ+V+Sup+Ela: õrīkšõmõst
     õrīkšõ+V+Sup+Tra: õrīkšõmõks
     õrīkšõ+V+Sup+Abe: õrīkšõmõt
     õrīkšõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: õrīkšõb
     õrīkšõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: õrīkšõt
     õrīkšõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: õrīkšõbõd
     õrīkšõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: õrīkšiz
     õrīkšõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [ȭrīkšizt, ȭrīkšiztõ]
     õrīkšõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [ȭrīkšizt, ȭrīkšiztõ]
     õrīkšõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: õrīkš
     õrīkšõ+V+Cond+Sg3: õrīkšõks
     õrīkšõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: õrīkš
     õrīkšõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: õrīkš
     õrīkšõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: õrīkšõgid
     õrīkšõ+V+Jus+Sg3: õrīkšõg
     õrīkšõ+V+Quo+Sg3: õrīkšiji
     õrīkšõ+V+ActPrfPrc: õrīkšõn
     õrīkšõ+V+PssPrfPrc: õrīkštõd
